Oklahoma, session 2025, SB827.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 23 O.S. 2021, Section 61.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 61.2. A. In any civil action arising from a claimed


bodily injury, the amount of compensation which the trier of fact


may award a plaintiff for economic loss shall not be subject to any


limitation.


B. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, in In


any civil action arising from a claimed bodily injury, the amount of


compensation which a trier of fact may award a plaintiff for


noneconomic loss shall not exceed Three Hundred Fifty Thousand


Dollars ($350,000.00) Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00),

Req. No. 777 Page 1


regardless of the number of parties against whom the action is


brought or the number of actions brought.


C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, there shall be


no limit on the amount of noneconomic damages which the trier of


fact may award the plaintiff in a civil action arising from a


claimed bodily injury resulting from negligence if the judge and


jury finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that the defendant’s


acts or failures to act were:


1. In reckless disregard for the rights of others;


2. Grossly negligent;


3. Fraudulent; or


4. Intentional or with malice.


D. In the trial of a civil action arising from claimed bodily


injury, if the verdict is for the plaintiff, the court, in a nonjury


trial, shall make findings of fact, and the jury, in a trial by


jury, shall return a general verdict accompanied by answers to


interrogatories, which shall specify all of the following:


1. The total compensatory damages recoverable by the plaintiff;


2. That portion of the total compensatory damages representing


the plaintiff’s economic loss; and


3. That portion of the total compensatory damages representing


the plaintiff’s noneconomic loss; and


4. If alleged, whether the conduct of the defendant was or


amounted to:

Req. No. 777 Page 2


a. reckless disregard for the rights of others,


b. gross negligence,


c. fraud, or


d. intentional or malicious conduct.


E. D. In any civil action to recover damages arising from


claimed bodily injury, after the trier of fact makes the findings


required by subsection D C of this section, the court shall enter


judgment in favor of the plaintiff for economic damages in the


amount determined pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection D C of this


section, and subject to paragraph 4 of subsection D of this section,


the court shall enter a judgment in favor of the plaintiff for


noneconomic damages. Except as provided in subsection C of this


section, in In no event shall a judgment for noneconomic damages


exceed the maximum recoverable amounts set forth in subsection B of


this section. Subsection B of this section shall be applied in a


jury trial only after the trier of fact has made its factual


findings and determinations as to the amount of the plaintiff’s


damages.


F. E. In any civil action arising from claimed bodily injury


which is tried to a jury, the jury shall not be instructed with


respect to the limit on noneconomic damages set forth in subsection


B of this section, nor shall counsel for any party nor any witness


inform the jury or potential jurors of such limitations.



Req. No. 777 Page 3


G. F. This section shall not apply to actions brought under The


Governmental Tort Claims Act or actions for wrongful death.


H. G. As used in this section:


1. “Bodily injury” means actual physical injury to the body of


a person and sickness or disease resulting therefrom;


2. “Economic damages” means any type of pecuniary harm


including, but not limited to:


a. all wages, salaries or other compensation lost as a


result of a bodily injury that is the subject of a


civil action,


b. all costs incurred for medical care or treatment,


rehabilitation services, or other care, treatment,


services, products or accommodations as a result of a


bodily injury that is the subject of a civil action,


or


c. any other costs incurred as a result of a bodily


injury that is the subject of a civil action; and


3. “Fraudulent” or “fraud” means “actual fraud” as defined


pursuant to Section 58 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


4. “Gross negligence” means the want of slight care and


diligence;


5. “Malice” involves hatred, spite or ill will, or the doing of


a wrongful act intentionally without just cause or excuse;



Req. No. 777 Page 4


6. “Noneconomic damages” means nonpecuniary harm that arises


from a bodily injury that is the subject of a civil action,


including damages for pain and suffering, loss of society,


consortium, companionship, care, assistance, attention, protection,


advice, guidance, counsel, instruction, training, education,


disfigurement, mental anguish and any other intangible loss; and


7. “Reckless disregard of another’s rights” shall have the same


meaning as willful and wanton conduct and shall mean that the


defendant was either aware, or did not care, that there was a


substantial and unnecessary risk that his, her or its conduct would


cause serious injury to others. In order for the conduct to be in


reckless disregard of another’s rights, it must have been


unreasonable under the circumstances and there must have been a high


probability that the conduct would cause serious harm to another


person.


I. H. This section shall apply to civil actions filed on or


after November 1, 2011 November 1, 2025.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-777 TEK 1/19/2025 5:44:11 AM









Req. No. 777 Page 5